Maine, session 132, LD183.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §1829-A is enacted to read:
§1829-A. Limitation on publicly owned land
1. Public ownership limited. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
publicly owned land in this State may not exceed 50% of the land area of a county. For
purposes of this section, "publicly owned land" means land in which the Federal
Government, the State, a county or a municipality holds property rights, including
easements, development rights, trust rights or other ownership interests.
With the approval of 2/3 of each House of the Legislature, the State, a county or a
municipality may exceed the limits of this subsection.
2. Report. The department shall, beginning April 15, 2026, report biannually to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over public lands matters
on the percentage of publicly owned land statewide and by county.